Washington statutes.
RCW 6.27.170

Garnished employee not to be discharged—Exception.

No employer shall discharge an employee for the reason that a creditor of the employee has subjected or attempted to subject unpaid earnings of the employee to a writ of garnishment directed to the employer: PROVIDED, HOWEVER, That this provision shall not apply if garnishments on three or more separate indebtednesses are served upon the employer within any period of twelve consecutive months.

[ 1987 c 442 s 1017; 1969 ex.s. c 264 s 16. Formerly RCW 7.33.160.]